North Dakota, session 69, HB1054.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. Section 24-01-12.4 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and enacted
as follows:
24-01-12.4. Sponsorship agreements for highway right of way services.
The director may enter a sponsorship agreement with any person to provide highway
related services within highway right of way. The director may acknowledge a sponsor that
provides litter control, rest area maintenance, or other services in the highway right of way
under this section with an acknowledgement sign within the highway right of way. For purposes
of this section, "acknowledgement sign" means a sign intended only to inform the public that a
highway-related service has been sponsored by a person. Acknowledgement signs facing the
same direction may not be placed less than one mile [1.61 kilometers] apart. An
acknowledgement sign must meet all the requirements of the adopted manual on uniform traffic
control devices.
Page No. 1 25.8042.01000